Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 23 Veterans’ Retraining and Reemployment Committees

30-23-1.
Purpose of chapter.

By order of the President of the United States on February 24, 1944, there was established in the Office of War Mobilization a retraining and reemployment administration to have general supervision and direction of activities relating to the retraining and reemployment of persons discharged or released from the armed services and to develop programs for that purpose and for the adequate care of those veterans, including physical and occupational therapy for the wounded and disabled and the resumption of education interrupted by the war. By its order issued May 17, 1944, the retraining and reemployment administration outlined a plan for the establishment and maintenance of veterans’ information service centers in local communities by which it sought to provide a way to merge the interest of all organizations, federal, state, local, and civic, in the rehabilitation and assistance of veterans. To aid in the carrying out of this plan, the retraining and reemployment administration established in each state a veterans’ service committee consisting of a representative of the Selective Service System, the War Manpower Commission, and the Veterans Administration with power to enlarge its membership to include representation from local organizations or to represent the federal government on state committees of the same nature. The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the establishment of local veterans’ retraining and reemployment committees and the establishment and maintenance of veterans’ information service centers by the several cities and towns in this state to the end that all veterans may be furnished in their own communities with full information with respect to their various rights and privileges under federal and state laws and with adequate advice and assistance in securing the benefits thereof and in solving the problems of readjusting their lives from war to peacetime activities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2107, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-1

.

30-23-2.
Establishment of local committees.

Each city and town may, by ordinance, provide for the creation of a veterans’ retraining and reemployment committee with authority to establish and maintain a veterans’ information service center in that municipality and each city and town is hereby authorized to make appropriations therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-2

.

30-23-3.
Composition and purpose of local committees.

Each local veterans’ retraining and reemployment committee, hereinafter referred to as the “local committee”, shall be fully representative of all federal, state, and local agencies serving veterans in the community, and of all community groups and institutions therein that are interested in, and can contribute to, the program for providing the veteran with one place in the locality where he or she can go in dignity for full information and adequate counsel and assistance in solving his or her problems.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 45.

30-23-4.
Organization of local committees.

The local committee shall elect a chairperson and such other officers as it may determine and may appoint an executive committee and subcommittees and define the duties of its officers and committees. The local committee may employ an executive secretary and clerical and other assistance within the amounts of appropriations available therefor. The officers and committees of the local committee shall serve at the pleasure of the local committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-4

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 45.

30-23-5.
Duty of local committees.

It shall be the duty of each local veterans’ retraining and reemployment committee to mobilize and promote all existing community resources for the aid of the veteran in one place, through the establishment and maintenance of a veterans’ information service center, wherein all veterans in the community shall be provided with full information concerning their rights and privileges under federal and state law; assistance in securing the benefits thereof; and advice and aid in solving the problems arising in the readjustment of their lives from war to peace time activities. It shall be the duty of each local committee to prescribe the duties of its veterans’ information service center and to take counsel with the state committee and its subcommittees from time to time, to the end that there shall be in every community adequate information, efficient aid, and sound advice for the veteran, and uniformity of procedure in dealing with his or her problems.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-5

.

30-23-6.
Functions of information service centers.

The major function of the veterans’ information service center shall be to provide information, aid, and counsel to all veterans in the community and their families and to maintain liaison with all existing federal, state, and local agencies. Actual determination of eligibility for benefits or special service must be the function of appropriate agencies. The veterans’ information service center shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the local committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-6

.

30-23-7.
Previous actions ratified.

The actions before April 23, 1945, of cities and towns in establishing veterans’ information service centers, and the appointment by the committees of executive secretaries and the hiring of clerical and other assistance, and the actions theretofore of cities and towns in allocating funds and making appropriations for those purposes, are hereby ratified and validated and all those actions shall have the same full force and effect as if they had been previously authorized by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1585, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2107, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-23-7

.